src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-astw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - astõ: # Verb 18 'eng /est astuda/fin' - full paradigm
     astõ+V+Inf: astõ
     astõ+V+Ger: astõs
     astõ+V+Sup: astām
     astõ+V+Sup+Ine: astāmõs
     astõ+V+Sup+Ela: astāmõst
     astõ+V+Sup+Tra: astāmõks
     astõ+V+Sup+Abe: astāmõt
     astõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: astāb
     astõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: astāt
     astõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: astābõd
     astõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: astīz
     astõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [astīzt, astīztõ]
     astõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [astīzt, astīztõ]
     astõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ast
     astõ+V+Cond+Sg3: astāks
     astõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: astā
     astõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: astõ
     astõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: astāgid
     astõ+V+Jus+Sg3: astāg
     astõ+V+QuoSg3: astāji
     astõ+V+ActPrfPrc: astõn
     astõ+V+PssPrfPrc: astõd
